Utah statutes.
57-3-103.   Effect of failure to record.

Each document not recorded as provided in this title is void as against any subsequent purchaser of the same real property, or any portion of it, if:

(1)  the subsequent purchaser purchased the property in good faith and for a valuable consideration; and

(2)  the subsequent purchaser's document is first duly recorded.

